Georgia, session 2025_26, SB213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the "Fair Business Practices Act of 1975," is amended in subsection (b) of Code
Section 10-1-393, relating to unfair or deceptive practices in consumer transactions unlawful
and examples, by deleting "and" at the end of paragraph (34), by replacing the period with
"; and" at the end of paragraph (35), and by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(36) Failure to comply with the provisions of Code Section 10-1-393.20."
S. B. 213
- 1 -

SB 213/FA
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"10-1-393.20.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Assessment task' means any assignment, essay, thesis, dissertation, report,
examination, project, or other assessable part of a course of study assigned or otherwise
given to a student or examinee for credit.
(2) 'Assignor' means:
(A) Any local school system or public school, private school, or home study program
in this state;
(B) Any institution of the University System of Georgia or unit of the Technical
College System of Georgia;
(C) Any organization that issues a professional license in this state; or
(D) Any employee or agent of such schools, programs, institutions, units, or
organizations.
(3) 'Commercial purpose' means a purpose relating to financial gain or other
compensation.
(4) 'For credit' means for evaluation by an assignor as a factor in the issuance of any
grade, evaluation, degree, diploma, certification, certificate, credential, exam score, or
professional license.
(5) 'Home study program' means a home study program as defined in subsection (c) of
Code Section 20-2-690.
(6) 'Person' means any individual, partnership, firm, limited liability company,
association, corporation, or other legal entity or unincorporated organization.
(7) 'Private school' shall have the same meaning as private school set forth in
subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-690.
(8) 'Student or examinee' means:
S. B. 213
- 2 -

SB 213/FA
(A) Any student of a local school system or public school, a private school, or a home
study program in this state;
(B) Any student of an institution of the University System of Georgia or a unit of the
Technical College System of Georgia; or
(C) Any examinee for a professional license in this state.
(9) 'Work product' means any written, electronic, recorded, pictorial, artistic, or other
form of work.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person, for a commercial purpose, to provide or otherwise
cause to be provided any work product to a student or examinee in a substantially
completed form that could, under the circumstances, reasonably be considered as being,
or forming a part of, an assessment task.
(c) No disclaimer or contractual language between a person providing work product and
a student or examinee shall exempt such person from the provisions of subsection (b) of
this Code section.
(d) Any violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in the conduct of consumer transactions under Part 2 of Article
15 of this chapter, the 'Fair Business Practices Act of 1975'; provided, however, that
enforcement against such violations shall only be by public enforcement by the Attorney
General pursuant to this part and shall not be enforceable through a private right of action
under Code Section 10-1-399.
(e) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to:
(1) Prohibit any person from providing tutorial assistance, research material, or general
information to a student or examinee; or
(2) Prohibit any person from providing an automated system, software, or platform that
generates specific responses to a student's or examinee's prompts; provided, however, that
such responses shall not constitute a substantially completed assessment task and the
S. B. 213
- 3 -

SB 213/FA
primary purpose of such automated system, software, or platform is not the provision of
assessment tasks."
SECTION 3.
Said part is further amended in subsection (a) of Code Section 10-1-399, relating to civil
actions for violations and remedies, by striking "Any" at the beginning of subsection (a),
and inserting "Except as otherwise provided, any" in lieu thereof.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 213
- 4 -